Hawaii statutes.
F. CONTINUING EDUCATION

[§304A-901] Tuberculosis clearance
certification; exemption. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a
person wishing to enroll at a campus within the University of Hawaii system
solely to participate in a noncredit, short-term course, lasting less than
fifteen days, shall not be required to present, as a condition to enrollment or
otherwise, a tuberculosis clearance certification. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next